Utah statutes.
16-6a-603.   Admission.

(1)  The bylaws may establish:

(a)  criteria or procedures for admission of members; and

(b)  the procedure for replacing:

(i)  a member; or

(ii)  a membership interest.

(2)  A person may not be admitted as a member without the person's consent.

